Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 29. Records

§§ 45-29-1 and 45-29-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2008, ch. 392, § 4, effective July 1, 2008.

§45-29-1. [Laws, 1983, ch. 424, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 1983.]

§45-29-3. [Laws, 1984, ch. 487; Laws, 1990, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 560, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 10, 2002.]